Massachusetts, session 194th, H823.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 54 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is
amended by inserting after 62 the following section:
“62A. Postponement and extension of qualifying periods for elections for public office
during state of emergency; Procedures for the Orderly Administration of Elections; Limitations.
Section 62A. (a) The state secretary shall have the authority to regulate elections in
emergency situations, including when the governor declares a state of emergency or a federal
agency declares a state of emergency or disaster exists. Such authorization shall include, but not
be limited to:
(1) Postponing or extending the qualifying periods provided in this chapter for the
qualification of candidates seeking municipal, county, or state-wide office; and
(2) Postponing the date of any primary, special primary, preliminary, election, or
special election in the affected area; and
of 2

(3) Providing for procedures for the orderly conduct elections; and
(4) In the case of municipal elections, postponing or suspending such local election,
including a preliminary, after consultation with local election officials.
Any such postponement or extension shall not exceed 45 days.
(b) The secretary of the commonwealth shall adopt, by rule or regulation, an elections
emergency contingency plan, which shall contain goals and policies that give specific direction
to state and local elections officials when an election has been suspended or delayed due to an
emergency or alternate voting procedures are necessary. The contingency plan shall address, but
not be limited to, the following concerns:
(1) Providing a procedure for state and local elections officials to follow when an
election has been suspended or delayed to ensure notice of the suspension or delay to the proper
authorities, the electorate, the communications media, poll workers, and the custodians of polling
places.
Providing a procedure for the release and certification of election returns and documents
relating to the election to the secretary’s office for elections suspended or delayed and
subsequently rescheduled under the provisions this section.”
of 2